Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ROCHESTER PUBLIC UTILITIES; REFUNDABLE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR ELECTRIC METERS AND SOFTWARE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Electric meters, software, and other components are exempt if used or consumed in the Rochester Public Utilities Advanced Metering Infrastructure Project and purchased after June 30, 2024, and before March 31, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2024, and before March 31, 2029. new text end